Washington statutes.
RCW 19.16.430

Violations—Operating agency without a license—Penalty—Return of fees or compensation.

(1) Any person who knowingly operates as a collection agency or out-of-state collection agency without a license or knowingly aids and abets such violation is punishable by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars or by imprisonment not exceeding one year or both.

(2) Any person who operates as a collection agency or out-of-state collection agency in the state of Washington without a valid license issued pursuant to this chapter shall not charge or receive any fee or compensation on any moneys received or collected while operating without a license or on any moneys received or collected while operating with a license but received or collected as a result of his, her, or its acts as a collection agency or out-of-state collection agency while not licensed hereunder. All such moneys collected or received shall be forthwith returned to the owners of the accounts on which the moneys were paid.

[ 2011 c 336 s 527; 1994 c 195 s 10; 1973 1st ex.s. c 20 s 6; 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 34.]